test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Pron-Oct_2016_gt-norm.yaml
  Pronouns:
      ise+Pron+Sg+Abl: endalt
      ise+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: endaltki
      ise+Pron+Sg+Ade: endal
      ise+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: endalgi
      ise+Pron+Sg+All: endale
      ise+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi: endalegi
      ise+Pron+Sg+Ela: endast
      ise+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: endastki
      ise+Pron+Sg+Ine: endas
      ise+Pron+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: endaski
      ise+Pron+Sg+Abe: endata
      ise+Pron+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: endatagi
      ise+Pron+Sg+Ess: endana
      ise+Pron+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: endanagi
      ise+Pron+Sg+Trm: endani
      ise+Pron+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: endanigi
      ise+Pron+Sg+Com: endaga
      ise+Pron+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: endagagi
      ise+Pron+Sg+Gen: enda
      ise+Pron+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: endagi
      ise+Pron+Sg+Tra: endaks
      ise+Pron+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: endakski
      ise+Pron+Sg+Abl: eneselt
      ise+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: eneseltki
      ise+Pron+Sg+Ade: enesel
      ise+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: eneselgi
      ise+Pron+Sg+All: enesele
      ise+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi: eneselegi
      ise+Pron+Sg+Ela: enesest
      ise+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: enesestki
      ise+Pron+Sg+Ine: eneses
      ise+Pron+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: eneseski
      ise+Pron+Sg+Abe: eneseta
      ise+Pron+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: enesetagi
      ise+Pron+Sg+Ess: enesena
      ise+Pron+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: enesenagi
      ise+Pron+Sg+Trm: eneseni
      ise+Pron+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: enesenigi
      ise+Pron+Sg+Com: enesega
      ise+Pron+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: enesegagi
      ise+Pron+Sg+Gen: enese
      ise+Pron+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: enesegi
      ise+Pron+Sg+Tra: eneseks
      ise+Pron+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: enesekski
      ise+Pron+Sg+Ill: endasse
      ise+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: endassegi
      ise+Pron+Sg+Ill: enesesse
      ise+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: enesessegi
      ise+Pron+Sg+Par: end
      ise+Pron+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: endki
      ise+Pron+Sg+Par: ennast
      ise+Pron+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: ennastki
      ise+Pron+Pl+Abl: endilt
      ise+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: endiltki
      ise+Pron+Pl+Ade: endil
      ise+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: endilgi
      ise+Pron+Pl+All: endile
      ise+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi: endilegi
      ise+Pron+Pl+Ela: endist
      ise+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: endistki
      ise+Pron+Pl+Ine: endis
      ise+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: endiski
      ise+Pron+Pl+Abe: endita
      ise+Pron+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: enditagi
      ise+Pron+Pl+Ess: endina
      ise+Pron+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: endinagi
      ise+Pron+Pl+Trm: endini
      ise+Pron+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: endinigi
      ise+Pron+Pl+Com: endiga
      ise+Pron+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: endigagi
      ise+Pron+Pl+Gen: endi
      ise+Pron+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: endigi
      ise+Pron+Pl+Tra: endiks
      ise+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: endikski
      ise+Pron+Pl+Abl: enestelt
      ise+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: enesteltki
      ise+Pron+Pl+Ade: enestel
      ise+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: enestelgi
      ise+Pron+Pl+All: enestele
      ise+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi: enestelegi
      ise+Pron+Pl+Ela: enestest
      ise+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: enestestki
      ise+Pron+Pl+Ine: enestes
      ise+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: enesteski
      ise+Pron+Pl+Abe: enesteta
      ise+Pron+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: enestetagi
      ise+Pron+Pl+Ess: enestena
      ise+Pron+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: enestenagi
      ise+Pron+Pl+Trm: enesteni
      ise+Pron+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: enestenigi
      ise+Pron+Pl+Com: enestega
      ise+Pron+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: enestegagi
      ise+Pron+Pl+Gen: eneste
      ise+Pron+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: enestegi
      ise+Pron+Pl+Tra: enesteks
      ise+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: enestekski
      ise+Pron+Sg+Nom: ise
      ise+Pron+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: isegi
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Par: eimida
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Par: eimidagi
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ade+Use/Rare: eimil
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Abl: eimillelt
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Abl: eimilleltki
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ade: eimillel
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ade: eimillelgi
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+All: eimillele
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+All: eimillelegi
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ela: eimillest
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ela: eimillestki
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ine: eimilles
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ine: eimilleski
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ill: eimillesse
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ill: eimillessegi
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Abe: eimilleta
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Abe: eimilletagi
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ess: eimillena
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ess: eimillenagi
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Trm: eimilleni
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Trm: eimillenigi
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Com: eimillega
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Com: eimillegagi
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Gen: eimille
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Gen: eimillegi
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Tra: eimilleks
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Tra: eimillekski
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Abl: eimilledelt
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Abl: eimilledeltki
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Ade: eimilledel
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Ade: eimilledelgi
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+All: eimilledele
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+All: eimilledelegi
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Ela: eimilledest
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Ela: eimilledestki
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Ine: eimilledes
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Ine: eimilledeski
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Ill: eimilledesse
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Ill: eimilledessegi
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Abe: eimilledeta
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Abe: eimilledetagi
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Ess: eimilledena
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Ess: eimilledenagi
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Trm: eimilledeni
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Trm: eimilledenigi
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Com: eimilledega
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Com: eimilledegagi
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Gen: eimillede
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Gen: eimilledegi
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Tra: eimilledeks
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Tra: eimilledekski
      eimiski+Pron+Abl+Use/NotNorm: eimillegilt
      eimiski+Pron+Abl+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimillegiltki
      eimiski+Pron+Ade+Use/NotNorm: eimillegil
      eimiski+Pron+Ade+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimillegilgi
      eimiski+Pron+All+Use/NotNorm: eimillegile
      eimiski+Pron+All+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimillegilegi
      eimiski+Pron+Ela+Use/NotNorm: eimillegist
      eimiski+Pron+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimillegistki
      eimiski+Pron+Ine+Use/NotNorm: eimillegis
      eimiski+Pron+Ine+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimillegiski
      eimiski+Pron+Ill+Use/NotNorm: eimillegisse
      eimiski+Pron+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimillegissegi
      eimiski+Pron+Abe+Use/NotNorm: eimillegita
      eimiski+Pron+Abe+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimillegitagi
      eimiski+Pron+Ess+Use/NotNorm: eimillegina
      eimiski+Pron+Ess+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimilleginagi
      eimiski+Pron+Trm+Use/NotNorm: eimillegini
      eimiski+Pron+Trm+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimilleginigi
      eimiski+Pron+Com+Use/NotNorm: eimillegiga
      eimiski+Pron+Com+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimillegigagi
      eimiski+Pron+Tra+Use/NotNorm: eimillegiks
      eimiski+Pron+Tra+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimillegikski
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Nom: eimis
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Par+Use/NotNorm: eimiskeid
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Par+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskeidki
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Abl+Use/NotNorm: eimiskeilt
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskeiltki
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Ade+Use/NotNorm: eimiskeil
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskeilgi
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+All+Use/NotNorm: eimiskeile
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskeilegi
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Ela+Use/NotNorm: eimiskeist
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskeistki
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Ine+Use/NotNorm: eimiskeis
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskeiski
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Ill+Use/NotNorm: eimiskeisse
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskeissegi
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Tra+Use/NotNorm: eimiskeiks
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskeikski
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Abl+Use/NotNorm: eimiskilt
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskiltki
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ade+Use/NotNorm: eimiskil
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskilgi
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+All+Use/NotNorm: eimiskile
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskilegi
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ela+Use/NotNorm: eimiskist
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskistki
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ine+Use/NotNorm: eimiskis
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskiski
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ill+Use/NotNorm: eimiskisse
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskissegi
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Abe+Use/NotNorm: eimiskita
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskitagi
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ess+Use/NotNorm: eimiskina
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskinagi
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Trm+Use/NotNorm: eimiskini
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskinigi
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Com+Use/NotNorm: eimiskiga
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Com+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskigagi
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskigi
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Gen+Use/NotNorm: eimiski
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Tra+Use/NotNorm: eimiskiks
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskikski
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Par+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskitki
      eimiski+Pron+Sg+Par+Use/NotNorm: eimiskit
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskidki
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Nom+Use/NotNorm: eimiskid
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Abl+Use/NotNorm: eimiskitelt
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskiteltki
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Ade+Use/NotNorm: eimiskitel
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskitelgi
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+All+Use/NotNorm: eimiskitele
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskitelegi
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Ela+Use/NotNorm: eimiskitest
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskitestki
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Ine+Use/NotNorm: eimiskites
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskiteski
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Ill+Use/NotNorm: eimiskitesse
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskitessegi
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Abe+Use/NotNorm: eimiskiteta
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskitetagi
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Ess+Use/NotNorm: eimiskitena
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskitenagi
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Trm+Use/NotNorm: eimiskiteni
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskitenigi
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Com+Use/NotNorm: eimiskitega
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Com+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskitegagi
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskitegi
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Gen+Use/NotNorm: eimiskite
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Tra+Use/NotNorm: eimiskiteks
      eimiski+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eimiskitekski
      eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Par: eikeda
      eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Par: eikedagi
      eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Nom: eikee
      eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Nom: eikeegi
      eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Abl: eikellelt
      eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Abl: eikelleltki
      eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Ade: eikellel
      eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Ade: eikellelgi
      eikeegi+Pron+Sg+All: eikellele
      eikeegi+Pron+Sg+All: eikellelegi
      eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Ela: eikellest
      eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Ela: eikellestki
      eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Ine: eikelles
      eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Ine: eikelleski
      eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Ill: eikellesse
      eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Ill: eikellessegi
      eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Abe: eikelleta
      eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Abe: eikelletagi
      eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Ess: eikellena
      eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Ess: eikellenagi
      eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Trm: eikelleni
      eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Trm: eikellenigi
      eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Com: eikellega
      eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Com: eikellegagi
      eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Gen: eikelle
      eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Gen: eikellegi
      eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Tra: eikelleks
      eikeegi+Pron+Sg+Tra: eikellekski
      eikeegi+Pron+Abl+Use/NotNorm: eikellegilt
      eikeegi+Pron+Abl+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eikellegiltki
      eikeegi+Pron+Ade+Use/NotNorm: eikellegil
      eikeegi+Pron+Ade+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eikellegilgi
      eikeegi+Pron+All+Use/NotNorm: eikellegile
      eikeegi+Pron+All+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eikellegilegi
      eikeegi+Pron+Ela+Use/NotNorm: eikellegist
      eikeegi+Pron+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eikellegistki
      eikeegi+Pron+Ine+Use/NotNorm: eikellegis
      eikeegi+Pron+Ine+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eikellegiski
      eikeegi+Pron+Ill+Use/NotNorm: eikellegisse
      eikeegi+Pron+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/NotNorm: eikellegissegi
      eikeegi+Pron+Abe+Use/NotNorm: eikellegita
